Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 2

Administration and Enforcement

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-2-101. Interest of enforcement officers in alcoholic liquors prohibited.

(a)

Neither the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration nor any officer, employee, deputy, or assistant thereof shall have any direct or indirect interest in or on any premises where alcoholic liquors are manufactured or sold, nor shall he or she have any direct or indirect interest in any business wholly or partially devoted to the manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquors or own any stock in any corporation which has any direct or indirect interest in the premises where alcoholic liquors are manufactured or sold or in any business wholly or partially devoted to the manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquors.

(b)

Any person violating any provision of this section shall, in addition to the penalty provided in this act, forfeit his or her office or employment or be removed therefrom.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 2, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 14103; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-202; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3299.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may apply to the Directors of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division as a result of the transfers of authority detailed in the notes to subchapter 2 of this chapter.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

3-2-102. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning restriction of the governor's pardoning power, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 653, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1935, No. 132, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 14241; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1106.

3-2-103. Information to be submitted by applicants.

(a)

Any person applying for any permit issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, except as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, shall meet the following requirements:

(1)

No applicant shall have been found guilty of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to:

(A)

Any felony by any court in the State of Arkansas; or

(B)

Any similar offense by a court in another state or of any similar offense by a military or federal court;

(2)(A)

In order to determine the applicant's suitability for a permit, the applicant shall be fingerprinted, and the fingerprints shall be forwarded for a criminal background check through the Department of Arkansas State Police.

(B)

After the completion of the criminal background check through the department, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the department to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check; and

(3)

The applicant shall sign a release that allows the department to release:

(A)

An Arkansas noncriminal justice background check to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board; and

(B)

A fingerprint card of the applicant to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to allow a federal fingerprint-based background check to be performed.

(b)

No fingerprint submission or criminal background check shall be required for any person applying for a nonresident seller's permit or for a wholesale support center permit as authorized by the Nonresident Beer Seller's Permit Act of 1995, §3-5-1301 et seq.

(c)

No fingerprint submission shall be required for any person applying for any permit that has a stated duration of five (5) days or less.

(d)

This section is supplementary to any and all requirements that exist for various permits issued by the division, and all other individual permit requirements shall continue to apply to those respective permit applications.

(e)

The division may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1248, § 1.

3-2-104. Definition of “schoolhouse”.

(a)

For all businesses regulated under this title by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board that are licensed or permitted after July 24, 2019, “schoolhouse” means:

(1)

A facility owned and operated by a public or private school or an open-enrollment charter school; and

(2)

A public or private daycare facility licensed by the State of Arkansas.

(b)

“Schoolhouse” does not include a home school.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 983, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Primary Regulatory Agencies

Publisher's Notes.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, which was the primary regulatory agency in the area of alcoholic beverage control at the time when most of the provisions of this subchapter were enacted, has been replaced by two divisions within the Department of Finance and Administration.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 1, created the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control which was a statutory administrative department of the state government. The section further provided that the department would consist of an Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, a Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control, two assistant directors, and such other personnel as the General Assembly authorized.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 2, created an Alcoholic Beverage Control Board. This Alcoholic Beverage Control Board was abolished by Acts 1955, No. 113, § 1, and a new Alcoholic Beverage Control Board created within the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control by § 2 of that act. See §3-2-201.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 5, in part transferred the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 1 transfer and transferred the Enforcement Division of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission, by a type 2 transfer, to the Department of Public Safety.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 5, further transferred the Department of Revenue which was created by Acts 1925, No. 88, as amended by Acts 1927, No. 115, and Acts 1953, No. 293, and its functions, powers, and duties to the Department of Finance and Administration. The section further provided that all references to the Department of Revenues and the Commissioner of Revenues would thereafter be deemed to refer to the Department of Finance and Administration and the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 9, provided in part that the Enforcement Division was transferred from the Department of Public Safety to the Department of Finance and Administration and would be located in a separate division to be known as the Enforcement Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, which division would function separately and apart from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. The section further provided that all the powers, functions, and duties added to the Enforcement Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control subsequent to the enactment of Acts 1971, No. 38, would be vested in the Enforcement Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control within the Department of Finance and Administration. The section stated that nothing in the 1981 act should be construed to reduce any right that an employee of the Enforcement Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control should have under any civil service or merit system.

As a consequence of these transfers, the alcoholic beverage control laws, except with respect to collection of taxes, are currently administered by two divisions within the Department of Finance and Administration: the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is the primary administrative agency and supervises, regulates, and controls the manufacture, transportation, sale, and consumption of alcoholic beverages. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division is the primary enforcement agency and, among other things, conducts inspections, investigates applicants for licenses, investigates permit violations, and confiscates illicit liquor. Each division is headed by its own director.

Pursuant to §3-2-205, the collection of taxes and permit and license fees is now the responsibility of the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Where possible, the language of these sections has been revised to reflect the current regulatory scheme. Where the statutory language does not readily permit such revision, the original language has been retained and Publisher's Notes have been inserted to explain current practice.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 24: July 1, 1951.

Acts 1953, No. 109, § 3: Feb. 20, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that it is impossible under the present law for the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or its director to adequately supervise, regulate, and control the sale of alcoholic beverages in the State of Arkansas; that such regulation and control is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety; and that the regulation and control as provided by this act is necessary to public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall take effect immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1955, No. 113, § 5: Mar. 1, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, it is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that much confusion and inconvenience now exists in the management of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and would in the future exist unless this reorganization is made, and that the passage of this act would remedy this situation; therefore, this act being necessary for the preservation of the public health, peace, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 343, § 4: Mar. 22, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the administration of the alcoholic beverage control laws of this state affect the public morals, safety, and welfare, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to provide for additional members of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board in order to provide for efficient operation of said board, and to protect the public peace, health, safety, and morals. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 941, § 3: Apr. 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the expense allowances now authorized for ABC enforcement officers are inadequate and are below the level of allowances provided to other enforcement officers, such as troopers of the Arkansas State Police; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to correct these inequities and to assure an adequate expense level for ABC enforcement officers, to encourage the recruitment and retention of competent ABC enforcement officers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 15: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the agencies, departments, and programs now performed through the Department of Public Safety could more efficiently and economically perform their respective duties and responsibilities through reorganized agencies and departments operating as separate entities; that substantial savings could be made by eliminating the central services of the Department of Public Safety; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide for advance planning for more efficient administration after the close of the current fiscal biennium of the various public safety programs of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 930, § 12: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 15: July 1, 1995.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 16: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law does not adequately protect the people of the State of Arkansas from unscrupulous activities of nonresident manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer; that the present law does not contain procedures for registration of nonresident manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer, nor enforcement of current laws against such groups; and that the present law does not empower the Alcoholic Beverage Division to effectively monitor the activities of manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 196, § 2: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2001 is essential to the operation of the agency in providing reimbursement allowance and expenses of ABC Enforcement officers, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2001 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-2-201. Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(a)

There is created an Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(b)

The board shall consist of five (5) persons appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, for a term of six (6) years.

(c)

The Chair of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall be designated by the Governor and may be removed as chair at any time by the Governor.

(d)

All action by the board shall be by a majority vote of the full membership of the board.

(e)

The board shall take no official action in connection with any matter except at a regular or special meeting in the office of the board at Little Rock, Arkansas.

(f)

The board is charged with the management of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(g)

In addition to any other powers, duties, and authority, the board shall be vested with the additional authority to establish written policies for the enforcement, by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, of the laws and rules affecting alcoholic beverage control.

(h)

The board shall have the power of review over the actions of the head of the enforcement division and its employees, including all disciplinary actions taken by the head of the division against any division employee and may, in any particular case, reverse such actions for good cause.

(i)

The members of the board may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 109, § 2; 1955, No. 113, §§ 2, 3; 1971, No. 343, § 1; 1981, No. 45, § 9; 1981, No. 790, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1302.1 — 48-1302.3, 48-1314.2, 48-1317.1; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 10; 2019, No. 315, § 32.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (g).

3-2-202. Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control — Staff.

(a)

The Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall be an attorney duly authorized to practice law by the Supreme Court, who shall present all evidence tending to prove violations of the law or rules at hearings held by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(b)

The director shall employ such other personnel as he or she may deem necessary and as may be authorized by the General Assembly.

(c)

All personnel employed by the director shall be subject to the approval of the board.

(d)

Any person employed by the director may be removed by him or her at any time subject to the approval of the board.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1304; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 33.

Publisher's Notes.

It is not clear whether this section now applies to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. In the years immediately prior to publication of this Code, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division was, in actual practice, appointed by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the approval of the Governor. Pursuant to §3-2-203, the head of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division is also appointed by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

Although regulatory authority over alcoholic beverages is now divided between the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, each of which has its own director, subsections (c) and (d) of this section may still apply to officers and employees of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and the two regulatory divisions.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

3-2-203. Enforcement division — Director and staff.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division shall be appointed by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary.

(b)

All enforcement personnel of the division shall be named by the director.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 941, § 1; 1981, No. 45, § 9; 1983, No. 930, § 7; 1985, No. 297, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1317.1, 48-1322; Acts 2001, No. 196, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3300.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” twice in (a).

3-2-204. Seals — Authentication of records.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board each may adopt, keep, and use a common seal. This seal shall be used for authentication of the records, process, and proceedings of the director and board, respectively. Judicial notice shall be taken of each of these seals in all of the courts of the state.

(b)

Any process, notice, or other paper which the director may be authorized by law to issue shall be deemed sufficient if signed by the director and authenticated by the seal of the director.

(c)

Any process, notice, or other paper which the board may be authorized by law to issue shall be deemed sufficient if signed by the Chair of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and authenticated by the seal of the board.

(d)

All acts, orders, proceedings, rules, entries, minutes, and other records of the director and all reports and documents filed with the director may be proved in any court of this state by copy thereof, certified by the director with the seal of the director attached.

(e)

All acts, orders, proceedings, rules, entries, minutes, and other records of the board and all reports and documents filed with the director may be proved in any court of this state by copy thereof, certified by the chair of the board with the seal of the board attached.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1309; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 34.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (d) and (e).

3-2-205. Powers and duties.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division shall have full responsibility for all phases of alcoholic beverage control in Arkansas.

(b)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall have the following powers, functions, and duties:

(1)

To fix by rule the standards of manufacturing, rectifying, and blending in order to ensure the use of proper ingredients and methods in the manufacturing, rectifying, and blending of vinous, spirituous, or malt liquors to be sold in the state;

(2)

To adopt rules for the supervision and control of the manufacture and sale of vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquors throughout the state not inconsistent with law;

(3)

To prescribe forms of applications for permits under this act and of all periodic reports deemed necessary to be made by any permittee;

(4)

To fix the hours during which vinous, spirituous, or malt liquors may be sold or dispensed at retail, as provided by this act;

(5)(A)

To keep records in proper form, to be prescribed by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, of all permits issued and all permits revoked under the provisions of this act and to keep records in such form so as to provide ready information as to the identity of all permit holders, including the names of stockholders who are not exempted under subdivision (b)(5)(B) of this section, and directors of corporations holding permits, and also the location of all permitted premises.

(B)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is not required to keep a record of the names of shareholders who are not the president or a director when the corporation:

(i)

Is publicly traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange; or

(ii)

Holds at least ten (10) permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the sale of alcoholic beverages; and

(6)

To adopt rules for the supervision and control of nonresident beer sellers' permits.

(c)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall have the following powers, functions, and duties:

(1)

To receive applications for and to issue, refuse, suspend, and revoke licenses to manufacturers, processors, distributors, wholesalers, retailers, and transporters of alcoholic beverages;

(2)

To call upon other administrative departments of the state, county, and city governments, sheriffs, city police departments, city marshals, and peace officers for such information and assistance as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may deem necessary in the performance of the duties imposed upon him or her by this subchapter;

(3)

To inspect or cause to be inspected any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, distributed, or sold;

(4)

In the conduct of any hearing:

(A)

To examine or cause to be examined under oath any person, and examine or cause to be examined books and records of any licensee;

(B)

To hear testimony and to take proof material for his or her information and the discharge of his or her duties hereunder;

(C)

To administer or cause to be administered oaths; and

(D)

For any such purposes, to issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books. These subpoenas shall be effective in any part of this state. Any circuit court, either in term time or vacation, by order duly entered may require the attendance of witnesses or the production of relevant books subpoenaed by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, and the court may compel obedience to its order by proceedings for contempt;

(5)

Such other powers, functions, and duties as are or may be imposed or conferred upon him or her by law; and

(6)

Any other powers, functions, and duties pertaining to the control of alcoholic beverages which previously were granted to the secretary and which are not specifically delegated to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board by the provisions of this subchapter.

(d)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division shall have the following functions, powers, and duties:

(1)

To call upon other administrative departments of the state, county, and city governments, sheriffs, city police departments, city marshals, and peace officers for such information and assistance as he or she may deem necessary in the performance of the duties imposed upon the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division by this subchapter;

(2)

To inspect or cause to be inspected any premises where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, distributed, or sold;

(3)

Such other powers, functions, and duties as are or may be imposed or conferred upon him or her by law; and

(4)

Any other powers, functions, and duties pertaining to the control of alcoholic beverages which previously were granted to the secretary and which are not specifically delegated to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the board by the provisions of this subchapter.

(e)(1)

The power and duty to collect taxes imposed on alcoholic beverages and to collect permit and license fees levied for the privilege of manufacturing, processing, selling, and transporting alcoholic beverages is specifically excepted from the powers and duties granted or assigned to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division. Provided, however, the permit or license holders' failure to pay taxes imposed on alcoholic beverages or any state or local gross receipts and compensating use taxes in a timely manner shall be grounds for the revocation or nonrenewal of their permits or licenses by the board.

(2)

The collection of all such taxes and permit or license fees shall be by the secretary and his or her agents and employees, as provided by law.

(3)

The secretary shall make a biennial report to the Governor and the General Assembly of his or her activities for the past year, which shall include statistics as to the amount of vinous (except wines), spirituous, or malt liquors manufactured in the State of Arkansas and the disposition thereof; the increase or decrease in their consumption over the preceding year; the amount of taxes and permit fees collected; and such other information as he or she deems advisable.

(4)

The secretary shall report by June 1 of each year to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the board any and all permit and license holders who are more than ninety (90) days delinquent on any alcoholic beverage sales tax, excise tax, supplemental mixed drink tax, any other tax relating to the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages, or any state or local gross receipts or compensating use taxes.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 2, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 14104; Acts 1951, No. 159, §§ 6, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-203, 48-1305, 48-1310; Acts 1993, No. 779, § 1; 1995, No. 537, § 11; 2013, No. 325, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 35, 36; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3301-3304.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 1, § 6, provides that the exclusion of wines from the provisions of Acts 1935, No. 108 is intended to exclude only wines or vinous liquors manufactured in the State of Arkansas.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 6, provided, in part, that the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, upon completion of its staff, would assume the duties and powers formerly assigned to the Commissioner of Revenues concerning the regulation, supervision, and control of the manufacture, processing, sale, and transportation of liquor, beer, and wine (including native wine) and all other alcoholic beverages.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (b)(5) as (b)(5)(A); in (b)(5)(A), substituted “permit holders” for “permits” and inserted “who are not exempted under subdivision (b)(5)(B) of this section”; and added (b)(5)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(2) and (b)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” throughout (b) through (e).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.

Cross References.

Vinous, spirituous, and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

3-2-206. Rules.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall adopt and promulgate such rules as shall be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter and any other alcohol control acts enforced in this state.

(b)

All rules of general application, including the amendment or repeal thereof, shall first be submitted by the director to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for its approval and upon approval shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(c)

All the valid rules adopted under the provisions of this subchapter shall be absolutely binding upon all licensees and enforceable by the director through the power of suspension or cancellation of licenses.

(d)

It is intended by this grant of power to adopt rules that the director shall be clothed with broad discretionary power to govern the traffic in alcoholic liquor and to enforce strictly all the provisions of the alcohol control laws of this state.

(e)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is authorized to assess a rule book fee which shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for each rule book.

(f)

A rule promulgated under this title that prohibits a person from possessing an alcoholic beverage outside of an establishment that holds a permit for on-premises consumption and from which the alcoholic beverage was purchased does not apply within a designated entertainment district as defined in §14-54-1412.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1311; Acts 2013, No. 1318, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §
37; 2019, No. 812, §
1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in (a) through (d); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” twice in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 812 added (f).

3-2-207. Qualifications and oath of personnel.

(a)

No person shall be appointed a member of the board or a director, agent, or employee of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not resided in the State of Arkansas successively for two (2) years immediately preceding the date of this appointment.

(b)

No person shall be so appointed who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony or any violation of any federal or state law concerning the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages or malt beverages prior or subsequent to the passage of this subchapter, nor shall a person be appointed who has paid a fine or penalty in settlement in any prosecution against him or her for any violation of such laws or who shall have forfeited his or her bond to appear in court to answer charges for any such violation.

(c)

No appointee may, directly or indirectly, individually or as a member of a partnership, or as a shareholder of a corporation, have any interests whatsoever in the manufacture, sale, or distribution of alcoholic beverages, nor receive any compensation or profit therefrom.

(d)

No appointee shall be an elected or appointed officer or employee of this state.

(e)

Each member of the board, director, and enforcement agent shall take and subscribe to an oath that he or she will support and enforce the provisions of this subchapter, the alcohol control laws of this state, the Arkansas Constitution, and the United States Constitution.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, §§ 7, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1306, 48-1307; Acts 1993, No. 122, § 1.

3-2-208. Solicitation or acceptance of bribe prohibited.

(a)

No member or employee of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or director or any employee of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division shall solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment from any manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer of alcoholic beverages or any person who is an applicant for any license under this subchapter, or from any officer, agent, or employee thereof.

(b)

No such person shall directly or indirectly solicit, request from, or recommend to any such person or to any officer, agent, or employee thereof the appointment of any person to any place or position.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1308.

3-2-209. Enforcement — Duties of state and local officers.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division shall fully and faithfully enforce the provisions of this subchapter and any other alcohol control law of this state relating to the manufacture, storage, transportation, distribution, sale, and consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(b)(1)

It shall be the responsibility of all law enforcement personnel of every village, town, city, county, and any other political subdivision of this state to fully and faithfully enforce the provisions of this subchapter and other alcohol control laws of this state relating to the manufacture, storage, transportation, distribution, sale, and consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(2)

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent or prohibit the exercise of concurrent jurisdiction by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 159, §§ 18, 19; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1317, 48-1318.